Utah statutes.
20A-3-303.   Form of absentee ballot.

(1)  For all elections, the election officer shall:

(a)  cause a sufficient number of official ballots to be known as absentee ballots to be prepared and printed; and

(b)  ensure that the absentee ballots are prepared and printed in the same form, are of the same size and texture, and contain the same information as the regular official ballot.

(2)  The election officer may prepare absentee ballots as paper ballots or ballot sheets or may use both methods.



Amended by Chapter 193, 2008 General Session

